New Jersey, session 221, A5397.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the superintendent of schools of a school district, which according to the most recent information reported by the Department of Education in the Taxpayers Guide to Education Spending, or in any successor guide or document, derives 70 percent or more of the districts total revenue from State aid revenue sources, shall obtain the prior written approval of the Commissioner of Education in order for any school district employee to attend a publicly funded out-of-State travel event, provided that the superintendent has approved the travel pursuant to subsection f. of section 15 of P.L.2007, c.53 (C.18A:11-12).  The superintendent of schools shall obtain the prior written approval of the commissioner before seeking the approval of a majority of the full voting membership of the board of education pursuant to subsection f. of section 15 of P.L.2007, c.53 (C.18A:11-12). b.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the board of education of a school district, which according to the most recent information reported by the Department of Education in the Taxpayers Guide to Education Spending, or in any successor guide or document, derives 70 percent or more of the districts total revenue from State aid revenue sources, shall obtain the prior written approval of the Commissioner of Education in order for any board of education member to attend a publicly funded out-of-State travel event.  The board shall obtain the prior written approval of the commissioner before seeking the approval of a majority of the full voting membership of the board pursuant to subsection g. of section 15 of P.L.2007, c.53 (C.18A:11-12). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.